Hawaii statutes.
§477E-5 Unfair or deceptive act or
practice. Any creditor who violates or attempts to violate any provision
of this chapter shall be deemed to have engaged in an unfair or deceptive act
or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce within the meaning of section
480-2. [L 1975, c 109, pt of §1; am L 1996, c 59, §2; am L 2008, c 19, §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next